Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [72A.329] HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE ADVERTISING. new text end new text begin An insurance company licensed to do business in Minnesota that offers homeowner's insurance coverage, as defined by section 65A.27, must include the following information in print, televised, electronic, and radio advertisements: new text end new text begin (1) the total amount the insurance company spent on advertising and marketing during the previous calendar year; and new text end new text begin (2) if the insurance company is publicly traded, the increase or decrease in the insurance company's stock prices for the previous calendar year. new text end